Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-4201
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-4201 to 71-4210 shall be known and may be cited as the Stroke System of Care Act.

Laws 2016, LB722, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB476, § 1.